Utah statutes.
73-3b-103.   Prohibitions.

(1)  A person may not artificially recharge an aquifer without first obtaining a recharge permit.

(2)  A person may not recover from an aquifer water that has been artificially recharged unless the person first obtains a recovery permit.

(3)  A person holding a recharge permit or recovery permit may not operate a recharge project or recovery project in a manner that is inconsistent with the permit conditions set by the state engineer.



Amended by Chapter 107, 2010 General Session

